Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-4,142
CLP-commercial learner's permit issuance.

Any resident or nondomiciled applicant may obtain a CLP-commercial learner's permit from the department by making application to licensing staff of the department. An applicant shall present proof to licensing staff that he or she holds a valid Class O license or commercial driver's license or a foreign nondomiciled applicant shall successfully complete the requirements for the Class O license before a CLP-commercial learner's permit is issued. An applicant shall also successfully complete the commercial driver's license general knowledge examination under section 60-4,155 and examinations for all previously issued endorsements as provided in 49 C.F.R. 383.25(a)(3) and 49 C.F.R. 383.153(b)(2)(vii). Upon application, the examination may be waived if the applicant presents (1) a Nebraska commercial driver's license which is valid or has been expired for less than one year or (2) a valid commercial driver's license from another state. The CLP-commercial learner's permit shall be valid for one year from the date of issuance. The successful applicant shall pay the fee prescribed in section 60-4,115 for the issuance of a CLP-commercial learner's permit.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 92;

Laws 1990, LB 980, § 17;

Laws 1998, LB 320, § 17;

Laws 2001, LB 108, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 574, § 23;

Laws 2003, LB 562, § 13;

Laws 2006, LB 853, § 11;

Laws 2012, LB751, § 32;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 27;

Laws 2016, LB311, § 17;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 28;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 36.